Utah statutes.
35A-4-102.   Public policy -- General welfare requires creation of
unemployment reserves -- Employment offices.
As a guide to the interpretation and application of this  chapter, the public
policy of this state is declared to be as follows: Economic insecurity due to
unemployment is a serious menace to the health, morals, and welfare of the
people of this state.  Unemployment is therefore a subject of general interest
and concern that requires appropriate action by the Legislature to prevent its
spread and to lighten its burden which now so often falls with crushing force
upon the unemployed worker and his family.  The achievement of social security
requires protection against this greatest hazard of our economic life.  This
objective can be furthered by operating free public employment offices in
affiliation with a nation-wide system of employment services, by devising
appropriate methods for reducing the volume of unemployment and by the
systematic accumulation of funds during periods of employment from which
benefits may be paid for periods of unemployment, thus maintaining purchasing
power and limiting the serious social consequences of unemployment.  The
Legislature, therefore, declares that in its considered judgment the public
good, and the general welfare of the citizens of this state require the
enactment of this measure, under the police power of the state, for the
establishment and maintenance of free public employment offices and for the
compulsory setting aside of unemployment reserves to be used for the benefit
of unemployed persons.
